Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7907
Health care provider, defined.

Health care provider means:

(1) A facility licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act;

(2) A health care professional licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act;

(3) A professional health care service entity; and

(4) An organization or association of health care professionals licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 2011, LB431, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB119, § 3.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.